Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Filing.
Sec. 45.29.523.
Information from filing office; sale or license of records.

If a person who files a written record requests an acknowledgment of the filing, the filing office shall send to the person an image of the record showing the number assigned to the record under AS

45.29.519(a)(1)

and the date and time of the filing of the record. However, if the person furnishes a copy of the record to the filing office, the filing office may instead

note on the copy the number assigned to the record under AS

45.29.519(a)(1)

and the date and time of the filing of the record; and

send the copy to the person.

If a person files a record other than a written record, the filing office shall communicate to the person an acknowledgment that provides

the information in the record;

the number assigned to the record under AS

45.29.519(a)(1)

; and

the date and time of the filing of the record.

The filing office shall communicate or otherwise make available in a record the following information to a person who requests it:

whether there is on file on a date and time specified by the filing office, but not a date earlier than three business days before the filing office receives the request, a financing statement that

designates a particular debtor;

has not lapsed under AS

45.29.515

with respect to all secured parties of record; and

if the request so states, has lapsed under AS

45.29.515

and a record of which is maintained by the filing office under AS

45.29.522(a)

;

the date and time of filing of each financing statement; and

the information provided in each financing statement.

In complying with its duty under (c) of this section, the filing office may communicate information in any medium. However, if requested, the filing office shall communicate information by issuing its written certificate.

The filing office shall perform the acts required by (a) — (d) of this section at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing office regulations but, in the case of a filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(2)

, not later than two business days after the filing office receives the request.

At least bi-weekly, the filing office described in AS

45.29.501(a)(2)

shall offer to sell or license to the public on a nonexclusive basis, in bulk, copies of all records filed in it under AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

, in every medium from time to time available to the filing office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.524.
Delay by filing office.

Delay by the filing office beyond a time limit prescribed by AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

is excused if

the delay is caused by interruption of communication or computer facilities, war, emergency conditions, failure of equipment, or other circumstances beyond control of the filing office; and

the filing office exercises reasonable diligence under the circumstances.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.525.
Fees.

The Department of Natural Resources shall adopt regulations that set the fees for

recording or filing and indexing a document under AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

; and

responding to a request for information or copies from the filing office, including for communicating whether there is on file a financing statement naming a particular debtor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.530.
Accounting; appropriations.

Under AS

37.05.146(c)

, fees for services for recording and related services of the Department of Natural Resources for secured transactions under AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code — Secured Transactions) shall be accounted for separately, and appropriations from the account are not made from the unrestricted general fund.

History.

(§ 5 ch 51 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, “AS

37.05.146(c)

” was substituted for “AS

37.05.146(b)

” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of
AS

37.05.146

.